Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Teachers’ Defined Benefit Retirement Plan.
Sec. 14.25.150.
Refund upon termination.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a terminated member is entitled to a refund of the balance of the member contribution account. A member is not entitled to a refund of supplemental contributions except as provided in AS

14.25.160(a)

.

A member who is terminated and is a vested member, deferred vested member, or who is entitled to benefits under AS

14.25.125

, and who is married at the time of application for a refund or whose rights to a refund are subject to a qualified domestic relations order is entitled to receive a refund of the balance of the member contribution account only if the member’s present spouse and each person entitled under the order consent to the refund in writing on a form provided by the administrator. The administrator may waive written consent from the person entitled under the order if the administrator determines that the person cannot be located or for other reasons established by regulation. The administrator may waive written consent from the spouse if the administrator determines that

the member was not married to the spouse during any period of the member’s employment with an employer;

the spouse has no rights to benefits under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

because of the terms of a qualified domestic relations order;

the spouse cannot be located;

the member and spouse have been married for less than two years and the member establishes that they are not cohabiting; or

another reason established by regulation exists.

A member who has received a refund of contributions in accordance with this section forfeits corresponding credited service under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 16 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 142 SLA 1957; am § 4 ch 78 SLA 1962; am § 7 ch 86 SLA 1963; am § 12 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 84 SLA 1969; am §§ 21 — 23 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 8 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 14 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 5, 6 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 21 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 14.25.153.
Rights under qualified domestic relations order.

A former spouse shall be treated as a spouse or surviving spouse under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

to the extent required by a qualified domestic relations order.
Rights under the order do not take effect until the order is filed with the administrator.

History.

(§ 7 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 14.25.155.
Nonoccupational death benefits.

If the death of a member occurs after completing less than one year of membership service and the proximate cause of death is not a bodily injury sustained or hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the member’s duties of employment, the member’s designated beneficiary shall be paid the balance of the member contribution account.

If the death of a member occurs after completing at least one year of membership service but before becoming a vested member, and the proximate cause of death is not a bodily injury sustained or hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the member’s duties of employment, the lump-sum death benefit described in AS

14.25.160(b)

and (c) shall be paid to the designated beneficiary of the member.

If the death of a vested member or deferred vested member occurs and the proximate cause of death is not a bodily injury sustained or hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the member’s duties of employment, the surviving spouse may elect to receive either the benefits described in (b) of this section or a 50 percent joint and survivor option as provided under AS

14.25.167(a)(2)

based on credited service to the date of the member’s termination. If no spouse survives a vested or deferred vested member, or if a person other than the spouse is designated as beneficiary in accordance with AS

14.25.166

, the administrator shall pay the designated beneficiary the benefits described in AS

14.25.160(b)

and (c). Benefits accrue from the first day of the month following the member’s death and are payable the last day of the month.

Benefits are not payable under this section if benefits are payable under AS

14.25.157

,

14.25.160

,

14.25.162

,

14.25.164

, or

14.25.167

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Sec. 14.25.157.
Occupational death benefits.

If (1) the death of a member occurs before the member first attains eligibility for normal retirement, and (2) the proximate cause of death is a bodily injury sustained or hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the member’s duties of employment, and (3) the injury or hazard is not the proximate result of wilful negligence on the part of the member, the administrator shall pay a monthly survivor’s pension equal to 40 percent of the member’s base salary at the time of termination of employment, divided by 12, to the member’s surviving spouse. If there is no surviving spouse, the administrator shall pay the monthly survivor’s pension in equal parts to the dependent children of the member. On the date the normal retirement of the member would have occurred if the member had lived, monthly payments must equal the monthly amount of the normal retirement benefit to which the member, had the member lived and continued employment until the member’s normal retirement date, would have been entitled with an average base salary as existed at the member’s death and the credited service to which the member would have been entitled. If the member does not have a spouse or dependent children at the time of death or if the member designates as beneficiary under AS

14.25.166

someone other than the surviving spouse or dependent children, the administrator shall pay the member’s designated beneficiary those benefits available to a beneficiary under AS

14.25.160(b)

and (c) and may not pay a benefit to the surviving spouse or dependent children.

The first payment of the surviving spouse’s pension or of a dependent child’s pension shall accrue from the first day of the month following the member’s death and is payable the last day of the month. The last payment shall be made for the last month in which there is an eligible surviving spouse or dependent child.

Benefits are not payable under this section if benefits are payable under AS

14.25.155

,

14.25.160

,

14.25.162

,

14.25.164

, or

14.25.167

.

If a member’s death is caused by an act of assault, assassination, or terrorism directly related to the person’s status as a member, whether the act occurs on or off the member’s job site, the death shall be considered to have occurred in the performance of and within the scope of the member’s duties for purposes of (a)(2) of this section. If the expressed or apparent motive and intent of the perpetrator of the harm inflicted upon the member was due to the performance of the member’s job duties or employment as a member, the death shall be considered to be directly related to the member’s status as a member. A member’s job duties are those performed within the course and scope of the member’s employment with an employer.

History.

(§ 15 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2002)

Sec. 14.25.160.
Death benefits.

A death benefit shall be paid and any supplemental contributions shall be refunded to the designated beneficiary, upon receipt of a valid claim and proof of the death of a member who

is not retired and is not eligible for benefits under AS

14.25.162

or

14.25.164

; and

either

has made supplemental contributions under AS

14.25.055

since the date one year immediately preceding the member’s death or since July 1, 1983, whichever is later; or

is making supplemental contributions under AS

14.25.055

but has made them for less than one year.

Upon the death of an active member who meets the conditions specified in (a) of this section, the amount of the death benefit is the sum of the following less any retirement benefit previously received by the member:

the member contribution account;

$100 times the years of membership service;

$1,000; and

$500 if the deceased member is survived by one or more dependent children at the time of death and if the designated beneficiary is a dependent child of the member or is the parent or guardian of the dependent child of the member.

If the sum of (b)(2) and (3) of this section exceeds $3,000, only $3,000 may be added to amounts under (b)(1) and (4) in calculating the death benefit under (b) of this section.

Upon the death of an inactive member who meets the conditions specified in (a) of this section, the death benefit is the amount determined in (b)(1) of this section.

Upon the death of a disabled member who is not eligible for normal retirement and who meets the conditions specified in (a) of this section, the death benefit is the amount determined in (b) of this section.

Upon the death of a retired member who meets the conditions specified in (a) of this section, the death benefit is the amount determined in (b)(1) of this section less all retirement benefits paid to the deceased member.

If supplemental contributions have been made under AS

14.25.055

, benefits may be payable under AS

14.25.162

or

14.25.164

if the deceased member meets the eligibility requirements of one of those sections.

Payment made to a beneficiary under this section is in place of any other benefit under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 7 ch 142 SLA 1957; am § 13 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 78 SLA 1962; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 18 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 16, 17 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 106 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 14.25.162.
Survivor’s allowance.

If an active or disabled member dies and leaves a dependent child, and supplemental contributions have been made under AS

14.25.055

for at least one year of credited service, a survivor’s allowance is payable under (b) of this section. If a retired member or a deferred vested member dies and leaves a dependent child, and supplemental contributions have been made under AS

14.25.055

for at least five years of credited service, a survivor’s allowance is payable under (b) of this section. Application for the survivor’s allowance must be made in writing to the administrator.

A survivor’s allowance is payable under this section as follows:

an allowance of 10 percent of the member’s base salary immediately before the member’s death, retirement, or disability shall be paid for each dependent child; if there are four or more dependent children, the total amount paid to those children is 40 percent of the member’s base salary before the member’s death, retirement, or disability, paid in equal amounts to each child; the allowance shall be recomputed for the month in which the number of dependent children is less than four and the benefits shall be decreased accordingly; the adoption of a dependent child does not terminate the survivor’s allowance payable under this section;

an allowance of 35 percent of the member’s base salary shall be paid to the member’s surviving spouse as long as there is an eligible dependent child, as determined under (b)(1) of this section, for whom the surviving spouse is legally responsible; if there is no surviving spouse, an allowance of 10 percent of the member’s base salary shall be paid to each court-appointed guardian, not to exceed one allowance for each child or for each group of children who have the same guardian or joint guardians;

when no further benefits are payable under this section, the difference between the amount that would have been paid under AS

14.25.160

and any payments made to the member, spouse, guardian, or dependent children under this section shall be paid to those beneficiaries described in AS

14.25.166

;

benefits are not payable under this section if benefits are payable under AS

14.25.155

,

14.25.157

,

14.25.164

, or

14.25.167

.

The survivor’s allowance accrues from the first day of the month following the death of a member and is payable on the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment must be made for the month in which a benefit is payable under this section. The last payment is for the month in which a benefit is payable under this section.

History.

(§ 16 ch 151 SLA 1966; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 84 SLA 1969; am §§ 11, 12 ch 138 SLA 1970; am § 15 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1972; am §§ 24, 25 ch 66 SLA 1973; am §§ 9, 10, 55 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 19 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 18, 19 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 14 ch 106 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Sec. 14.25.163.
Rollover distributions and rollover contributions.

A distributee may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator, to have all or part of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in the direct rollover.

Except as provided by AS

14.25.075(f)

, the plan does not accept contributions of eligible rollover distributions.

In this section,

“direct rollover” means the payment of an eligible rollover distribution by the plan to an eligible retirement plan specified by a distributee who is eligible to elect a direct rollover;

“distributee” means a member or a beneficiary who is the surviving spouse of the member or an alternate payee;

“eligible retirement plan” means

an individual retirement account described in 26 U.S.C. 408(a);

an individual retirement annuity defined in 26 U.S.C. 408(b);

an annuity plan described in 26 U.S.C. 403(a);

a qualified trust described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a);

on and after January 1, 2002, an annuity plan described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b);

on or after January 1, 2002, a governmental plan described in 26 U.S.C. 457(b); or

on or after January 1, 2008, a Roth IRA described in 26 U.S.C. 408A;

“eligible rollover distribution” means a distribution of all or part of a total account to a distributee, except for

a distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal installments payable not less frequently than annually over the life expectancy of the distributee or the joint and last survivor life expectancy of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary, as defined in 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9);

a distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal installments payable not less frequently than annually over a specified period of 10 years or more;

a distribution that is required under 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9);

the portion of any distribution that is not includable in gross income; however, a portion under this subparagraph may be transferred only to an individual retirement account or annuity described in 26 U.S.C. 408(a) or (b), to a qualified plan described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a) or 403(a), or to an annuity contract described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b), that agrees to separately account for amounts transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of the distribution that is includable in gross income and the portion of the distribution that is not includable in gross income; and

other distributions that are reasonably expected to total less than $200 during a year.

History.

(§ 9 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 7 — 10 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 14.25.164.
Spouse’s pension.

If an active or disabled member dies, a pension is payable to the member’s spouse if the member made supplemental contributions under AS

14.25.055

for at least one year of credited service. If a retired member or deferred vested member dies, a pension is payable to the member’s spouse if the member made supplemental contributions under AS

14.25.055

for at least five years of credited service. Application for the spouse’s pension must be made in writing to the administrator.

A spouse’s pension is payable under this section as follows:

a spouse’s pension is equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefit that the deceased member was receiving; if the member was not receiving a retirement benefit, the spouse’s pension is equal to 50 percent of the amount the member would have received, based on the member’s average base salary and credited service to the date of the member’s death and assuming that the member would have been eligible for a normal retirement benefit as of that date;

in the event of the death of a member’s spouse who is receiving a spouse’s pension, the difference between the amount that would have been paid under AS

14.25.160

and any payments made to the member, spouse, guardian, or dependent children shall be paid to those beneficiaries described in AS

14.25.166

;

benefits are not payable under this section if benefits are payable under AS

14.25.155

,

14.25.157

,

14.25.162

, or

14.25.167

.

The spouse’s pension accrues from the first day of the month following the death of a member and is payable on the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment must be made for the month in which a benefit is payable under this section. The last payment is for the month in which the spouse dies.

History.

(§ 17 ch 151 SLA 1966; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 19 ch 69 SLA 1970; am §§ 26 — 28 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 11 ch 173 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 20 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 13 SLA 1982; am § 15 ch 106 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Sec. 14.25.165.
Distribution requirements.

The entire interest of a member must be distributed or must begin to be distributed not later than the member’s required beginning date.

If a member dies after the distribution of the member’s interest has begun but before the distribution has been completed, the remaining portion of the interest shall continue to be distributed at least as rapidly as under the method of distribution being used before the member’s death.

If a member has made a distribution election and dies before the distribution of the member’s interest begins, distribution of the member’s entire interest shall be completed by December 31 of the calendar year containing the fifth anniversary of the member’s death. However, if any portion of the member’s interest is payable to a designated beneficiary, distributions may be made over the life of the designated beneficiary or over a period certain not greater than the life expectancy of the designated beneficiary, commencing on or before December 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the member died, and, if the designated beneficiary is the member’s surviving spouse, the date distributions are required to begin may not be earlier than the later of December 31 of the calendar year (1) immediately following the calendar year in which the member died, or (2) in which the member would have attained 70 1/2 years of age, whichever is earlier. If the surviving spouse dies after the member but before payments to the spouse have begun, the provisions of this subsection apply as if the surviving spouse were the member. An amount paid to a child of the member will be treated as if it were paid to the surviving spouse if the amount becomes payable to the surviving spouse when the child reaches the age of majority.

If a member has not made a distribution election before the member’s death, the member’s designated beneficiary must elect the method of distribution not later than December 31 of the calendar year (1) in which distributions would be required to begin under this section, or (2) that contains the fifth anniversary of the date of death of the member, whichever is earlier. If the member does not have a designated beneficiary or if the designated beneficiary does not elect a method of distribution, distribution of the member’s entire interest must be completed by December 31 of the calendar year containing the fifth anniversary of the member’s death.

For purposes of (c) of this section, distribution of a member’s interest is considered to begin (1) on the member’s required beginning date, or (2) if the designated beneficiary is the member’s surviving spouse and the surviving spouse dies after the member but before payments to the spouse have begun, on the date distribution is required to begin to the surviving spouse. If distribution in the form of an annuity irrevocably commences to the member before the required beginning date, the date distribution is considered to begin is the date that the distribution actually commences.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, the requirements of this section apply to all distributions of a member’s interest and take precedence over any inconsistent provisions of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

All distributions required under this section are determined and made in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations adopted under that statute, including any minimum distribution incidental benefit requirement.

Unless otherwise specified, the provisions of this section apply to calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 1983.

In this section,

“designated beneficiary” means the individual who is designated as the beneficiary under the plan in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations adopted under that statute;

“required beginning date” means the first day of April of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the member either attains 70 1/2 years of age or actually retires, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 10 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 12 ch 92 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 14.25.166.
Designation of beneficiary.

Each member shall designate the beneficiary or beneficiaries to whom the administrator shall distribute benefits payable under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

as a consequence of the member’s death. Notwithstanding a previous designation of beneficiary, a person who is the spouse of a member at the time of the member’s death automatically becomes the designated beneficiary if the spouse was married to the member during part of the member’s employment for an employer

except to the extent a qualified domestic relations order filed with the administrator provides for payment to a former spouse or other dependent of the member; or

unless the member filed a revocation of beneficiary accompanied by a written consent to the revocation from the present spouse and each person entitled under the order; however, consent of the present spouse is not required if the member and the present spouse had been married for less than two years on the date of the member’s death and if the member established when filing the revocation that the member and the present spouse were not cohabiting.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, the member may change or revoke the designation without notice to the beneficiary or beneficiaries at any time. If a member designates more than one beneficiary, each shares equally unless the member specifies a different allocation or preference. The designation of a beneficiary, a change or revocation of a beneficiary, and a consent to revocation of a beneficiary shall be made on a form provided by the administrator and is not effective until filed with the administrator.

If a member fails to designate a beneficiary, or if no designated beneficiary survives the member, the death benefit shall be paid

to the surviving spouse or, if there is none surviving,

to the surviving children in equal parts or, if there are none surviving,

to the surviving parents in equal parts or, if there are none surviving,

to the estate.

A person claiming entitlement to benefits payable under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

as a consequence of a member’s death shall provide the administrator with a marriage certificate, divorce or dissolution judgment, or other evidence of entitlement. Documents establishing entitlement may be filed with the administrator immediately after a change in the member’s marital status. If the administrator does not receive notification of a claim before the date 10 days after the member’s death, the person claiming entitlement is not entitled to receive from the division of retirement and benefits any benefit already paid by the administrator.

History.

(§ 21 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 14.25.167.
Joint and survivor option.

Benefits payable under this section are in place of benefits payable under AS

14.25.110

,

14.25.125

,

14.25.155

,

14.25.157

,

14.25.160

,

14.25.162

, or

14.25.164

. Upon filing an application for retirement with the administrator, or when a disabled member becomes eligible for normal retirement under AS

14.25.130(e)

, the member shall designate the person who is the member’s spouse at the time of appointment to retirement as the contingent beneficiary. However, if the designation of the spouse is revoked under (c) of this section, the member may designate a dependent approved by the administrator as the contingent beneficiary or may take normal or early retirement under AS

14.25.110

or

14.25.125

. The administrator shall pay benefits under the option elected by the member. The member may elect an option that provides that

the member is entitled to receive a reduced benefit payable for life, and, after the member’s death, the contingent beneficiary is entitled to receive payments in the amount of 75 percent of the reduced benefit for life;

the member is entitled to receive a reduced benefit payable for life, and, after the member’s death, the contingent beneficiary is entitled to receive payments in the amount of 50 percent of the reduced benefit for life; or

the member is entitled to receive a reduced benefit payable during the joint lifetime of the member and the contingent beneficiary, and, after the death of either the member or the contingent beneficiary, the survivor is entitled to receive payments in the amount of 66-2/3 percent of the reduced benefit for life.

The aggregate of the pension payments expected to be paid to a member and the member’s contingent beneficiary under the options set out in (a) of this section shall be the actuarial equivalent of the pension that the member is otherwise entitled to receive upon retirement.

A member may elect or change an option without the approval of the administrator if the member’s election or change is filed in writing with the administrator before the effective date of the member’s retirement. A member may revoke a joint and survivor option if the member files with the administrator before the effective date of the member’s retirement a revocation and a consent to the revocation signed by the member’s present spouse and each person entitled to benefits under a qualified domestic relations order on forms provided by the administrator. The administrator may waive the requirement for written consent from

a person entitled under the order if the person cannot be located or for another reason established by regulation; or

the spouse if

the member is not married;

the member was not married to the spouse during any period of the member’s employment with an employer;

the spouse has no rights to the option because of the terms of a qualified domestic relations order;

the spouse cannot be located;

the member and spouse have been married for less than two years and the member establishes that they are not cohabiting; or

another reason is established under regulations of the administrator.

A member, including a deferred vested member, may, regardless of age, elect a joint and survivor option any time before appointment to receive a retirement benefit.

If either the member or contingent beneficiary dies before the member is appointed to retirement, the election becomes inoperative. Once the member is appointed to retirement, the election is irrevocable, even if the retired member is reemployed. Any additional retirement benefit to which the reemployed member may become entitled will be paid in accordance with the initial election made under this section, unless the contingent beneficiary is deceased. If the contingent beneficiary is deceased, the benefits earned during the period of reemployment are subject to AS

14.25.110

, or this section if another contingent beneficiary was designated during the period of reemployment. All other benefits earned during previous periods of employment are subject to the election at the time the member was appointed to retirement. If death occurs during the period of reemployment and the proximate cause of death is not a bodily injury sustained or hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the member’s duties of employment, those benefits earned while reemployed are subject to AS

14.25.155(c)

. All other benefits earned during previous periods of employment are subject to the election at the time the member was appointed to retirement. If death occurs during the period of reemployment and the proximate cause of death is a bodily injury sustained or hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the member’s duties of employment and the injury or hazard is not the proximate result of wilful negligence on the part of the member, all benefits earned during all periods of employment are subject to AS

14.25.157

.

The member and any person claiming to be a contingent beneficiary shall file with the administrator a marriage certificate, divorce or dissolution judgment, or other evidence necessary to determine the applicability of this section and the identity of any contingent beneficiary.

If the administrator determines, based on the affidavit of the member and other evidence, that a member is eligible to elect a form of payment other than a joint and survivor option under this section, and no contrary evidence is presented to the administrator within 60 days after the effective date of the member’s retirement, no claim under this section, made by a spouse or former spouse of the member, may be paid if payment would result in an increase in actuarial liability to the plan.

If a member fails to elect an option under (a) of this section and no effective revocation is filed with the administrator, the member is considered to have elected the option provided in (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 21 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 14.25.168.
Medical benefits.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the following persons are entitled to major medical insurance coverage under this section:

for teachers first hired before July 1, 1990,

a teacher who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage;

the spouse and dependent children of the teacher described in (A) of this paragraph;

the surviving spouse of a deceased teacher who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage;

the dependent children of a deceased teacher who are dependent on the surviving spouse described in (C) of this paragraph;

for teachers first hired on or after July 1, 1990,

a teacher who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage for the teacher;

the spouse of the teacher described in (A) of this paragraph if the teacher elected coverage for the spouse;

the dependent children of the teacher described in (A) of this paragraph if the teacher elected coverage for the dependent children;

the surviving spouse of a deceased teacher who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage;

the dependent children of a deceased teacher who are dependent on the surviving spouse described in (D) of this paragraph if the surviving spouse has elected coverage for the dependent children.

After an election of coverage under this section, major medical insurance coverage takes effect on the same date as retirement benefits begin and stops when the member or survivor is no longer eligible to receive a monthly benefit. The coverage for persons age 65 or older is the same as that available for persons under age 65. The benefits payable to those persons age 65 or older supplement any benefits provided under the federal old age, survivors and disability insurance program. The medical premium and optional insurance premiums owed by a member or survivor shall be deducted from the benefit owed to the member or survivor before payment of the benefit.

Receipt under a qualified domestic relations order of a monthly benefit from the plan does not entitle a person or the person’s spouse or child to insurance coverage under (a) of this section. However, a member’s former spouse who receives a monthly benefit under a qualified domestic relations order is entitled to receive major medical insurance coverage if the former spouse

elects the coverage within 60 days after the first monthly benefit paid under the order is mailed first class or otherwise delivered; and

pays the premium established by the administrator for the coverage.

A benefit recipient may elect major medical insurance coverage in accordance with regulations and under the following conditions:

a person who has less than 25 years of membership service and who is younger than 60 years of age must pay an amount equal to the full monthly group premium for retiree major medical insurance coverage;

a disabled member, a disabled member who is appointed to normal retirement, a person 60 years of age or older, or a person who has at least 25 years of membership service is not required to make premium payments.

The administrator shall inform members who have requested appointment to retirement that the health insurance coverage available to retired members may be different from the health insurance coverage provided to employees. The administrator shall also notify those members of time limits for selecting optional health insurance coverage and whether the election is irrevocable. A member who has requested appointment to retirement shall indicate in writing on a form provided by the administrator that the member has received the information required by this subsection and whether the member has chosen to receive optional health insurance coverage.

On and after July 1, 2007, benefits under this section shall be provided in part by the Alaska retiree health care trust established under AS

39.30.097(a)

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 200 SLA 1975; am § 22 ch 137 SLA 1982; §§ 16, 17 ch 117 SLA 1986; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 97 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 6 ch 57 SLA 2001; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 2001; am § 22 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 11 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1984, the word “under” was inserted in the last sentence of subsection (b) to correct a manifest error of omission in § 22, ch. 137, SLA 1982.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For major medical insurance, see 2 AAC 39, art. 3.

For appeals from denials of medical claims under the medical coverage provided by the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 39, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Pre-funding of the medical component of PERS and TRS benefits, to the extent that pre-funding would be considered an accrued benefit, may not be discontinued for members who were employed during the period that statutes required pre-funding.
Funding of medical benefits may be set at less than 100% funding for new members.
April 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Health benefits provided by the state’s retirement system statutes are part of the retirement benefit package that becomes part of the contract of employment when the public employee is hired.
As such, retiree health benefits are among the benefits that must be included in the PERS and TRS employer contribution rates under AS

14.25.070

, AS

39.30.095

, and AS

39.35.250

—

39.35.290

.
Consistent with these statutes, employer contribution rates have historically been set to fully fund retiree health benefits.
April 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.25.169.
Duplicate benefits.

If payments from this retirement plan are due to a teacher or to the teacher’s spouse under more than one provision of this plan, the teacher or spouse shall elect under which provision and which benefit the teacher or spouse wishes to receive and no payments may be made under any other provision. However, benefits under AS

14.25.155

,

14.25.157

,

14.25.160

,

14.25.162

,

14.25.164

, and

14.25.167

shall be paid in addition to those benefits or that service credit a person is entitled to receive because of the person’s own membership in the retirement plan.
A teacher may not receive (1) duplicate credit under this plan for the same period of service, (2) more than one year of service credit in the course of a school year, or (3) a benefit while accruing service credit under this plan, except as provided in this section.

History.

(§ 19 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 184 SLA 1972; am § 23 ch 137 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 14.25.170.
Administration. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]